Utah statutes.
63M-1-1111.   Annual report.

(1)  A county or municipality designated as a recycling market development zone shall report by no later than July 31 of each year to the office regarding the economic activity that has occurred in the zone following the designation.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the office may make rules providing for the form and content of the annual reports.

